North Carolina, session 2025, SB1071.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of S.L. 2003-81 reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. A county may adopt ordinances providing that legal notice of public hearings
may be published through electronic means in lieu of publication in any newspaper. The
publication may be on the county's Internet site or by any other means. Ordinances adopted
pursuant to this section For any county business which requires public notice, the county may
provide the required notice through electronic means in lieu of traditional means of notice. Such
electronic means may include, but are not limited to, posting notice on the county's website or
any other means deemed appropriate by the county to communicate said notice to the public.
Any electronic notice provided pursuant to this act shall not supersede any State law that requires
notice by mail to certain classes of persons or the posting of signs on certain property, nor shall
there be any alteration of the and shall not alter the publication schedule required by State law."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Cabarrus County.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S1071-v-1*